Florida, session 2026, HB125.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 683.338, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
683.338 Charlie Kirk Day of Remembrance.—
(1) October 14 of each year is designated as "Charlie Kirk
Day of Remembrance."
(2) The Governor may annually issue a proclamation
designating October 14 as "Charlie Kirk Day of Remembrance."
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb125-01-c1